Illinois, session 104th, SB1446.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Fire Marshal Act is amended by adding 5Section 5 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 2905/5 new)7    Sec. 5. Tracking firefighter mortality. Beginning no later 8than 6 months after the effective date of this amendatory Act 9of the 104th General Assembly, the Office of the State Fire 10Marshal shall track and record the manner of death for all 11firefighters in Illinois, including suicide and the various 12types of cancer.